Utah statutes.
70A-2-616.   Procedure on notice claiming excuse.

(1)  Where the buyer receives notification of a material or indefinite delay
or an allocation justified under the preceding section he may by written
notification to the seller as to any delivery concerned, and where the
prospective deficiency substantially impairs the value of the whole contract
under the provisions of this chapter relating to breach of installment
contracts (Section 70A-2-612), then also as to the whole,
(a)  terminate and thereby discharge any unexecuted portion of the contract;
or
(b)  modify the contract by agreeing to take his available quota in
substitution.
(2)  If after receipt of such notification from the seller the buyer fails so
to modify the contract within a reasonable time not exceeding thirty days the
contract lapses with respect to any deliveries affected.
(3)  The provisions of this section may not be negated by agreement except in
so far as the seller has assumed a greater obligation under the preceding
section.
